Utah statutes.
41-1a-503.   Certificate of title or Affidavit of Mobile Home Affixture
required -- Application by owner.
(1)  The owner of a manufactured home or mobile home shall apply to the
division for a certificate of title unless the manufactured home or mobile
home is previously registered as real property under Subsection 41-1a-506(1).
(2) (a)  An owner of a manufactured home or mobile home previously issued a
certificate of title who attaches that home to real property shall apply for
an Affidavit of Mobile Home Affixture within 45 days of attaching to the
property.
(b)  Upon application, the division shall issue an Affidavit of Mobile Home
Affixture in lieu of a certificate of title.
(c)  However, manufactured homes and mobile homes are not exempt from the
other requirements of this part.
(3) (a)  The owner of a manufactured home or mobile home previously issued an
Affidavit of Mobile Home Affixture who separates that home from the real
property shall apply for a certificate of title within 45 days of the
separation, prior to any transfer of ownership of that home.
(b)  Upon application, the division shall issue a certificate of title in lieu
of an Affidavit of Mobile Home Affixture.
